algorithms/russian/stem.sbl
stringescapes {}

/* the 32 Cyrillic letters in the KOI8-R coding scheme, and represented
   in Latin characters following the conventions of the standard Library
   of Congress transliteration: */

stringdef a    hex 'C1'
stringdef b    hex 'C2'
stringdef v    hex 'D7'
stringdef g    hex 'C7'
stringdef d    hex 'C4'
stringdef e    hex 'C5'
stringdef zh   hex 'D6'
stringdef z    hex 'DA'
stringdef i    hex 'C9'
stringdef i`   hex 'CA'
stringdef k    hex 'CB'
stringdef l    hex 'CC'
stringdef m    hex 'CD'
stringdef n    hex 'CE'
stringdef o    hex 'CF'
stringdef p    hex 'D0'
stringdef r    hex 'D2'
stringdef s    hex 'D3'
stringdef t    hex 'D4'
stringdef u    hex 'D5'
stringdef f    hex 'C6'
stringdef kh   hex 'C8'
stringdef ts   hex 'C3'
stringdef ch   hex 'DE'
stringdef sh   hex 'DB'
stringdef shch hex 'DD'
stringdef "    hex 'DF'
stringdef y    hex 'D9'
stringdef '    hex 'D8'
stringdef e`   hex 'DC'
stringdef iu   hex 'C0'
stringdef ia   hex 'D1'

/* The same in Unicode (commented out here):

stringdef a    decimal '1072'
stringdef b    decimal '1073'
stringdef v    decimal '1074'
stringdef g    decimal '1075'
stringdef d    decimal '1076'
stringdef e    decimal '1077'
stringdef zh   decimal '1078'
stringdef z    decimal '1079'
stringdef i    decimal '1080'
stringdef i`   decimal '1081'
stringdef k    decimal '1082'
stringdef l    decimal '1083'
stringdef m    decimal '1084'
stringdef n    decimal '1085'
stringdef o    decimal '1086'
stringdef p    decimal '1087'
stringdef r    decimal '1088'
stringdef s    decimal '1089'
stringdef t    decimal '1090'
stringdef u    decimal '1091'
stringdef f    decimal '1092'
stringdef kh   decimal '1093'
stringdef ts   decimal '1094'
stringdef ch   decimal '1095'
stringdef sh   decimal '1096'
stringdef shch decimal '1097'
stringdef "    decimal '1098'
stringdef y    decimal '1099'
stringdef '    decimal '1100'
stringdef e`   decimal '1101'
stringdef iu   decimal '1102'
stringdef ia   decimal '1103'

*/

routines ( mark_regions R2
           perfective_gerund
           adjective
           adjectival
           reflexive
           verb
           noun
           derivational
           tidy_up
)

externals ( stem )

integers ( pV p2 )

groupings ( v )

define v '{a}{e}{i}{o}{u}{y}{e`}{iu}{ia}'

define mark_regions as (

    $pV = limit
    $p2 = limit
    do (
        gopast v  setmark pV  gopast non-v
        gopast v  gopast non-v  setmark p2
       )
)

backwardmode (

    define R2 as $p2 <= cursor

    define perfective_gerund as (
        [substring] among (
            '{v}'
            '{v}{sh}{i}'
            '{v}{sh}{i}{s}{'}'
                ('{a}' or '{ia}' delete)
            '{i}{v}'
            '{i}{v}{sh}{i}'
            '{i}{v}{sh}{i}{s}{'}'
            '{y}{v}'
            '{y}{v}{sh}{i}'
            '{y}{v}{sh}{i}{s}{'}'
                (delete)
        )
    )

    define adjective as (
        [substring] among (
            '{e}{e}' '{i}{e}' '{y}{e}' '{o}{e}' '{i}{m}{i}' '{y}{m}{i}'
            '{e}{i`}' '{i}{i`}' '{y}{i`}' '{o}{i`}' '{e}{m}' '{i}{m}'
            '{y}{m}' '{o}{m}' '{e}{g}{o}' '{o}{g}{o}' '{e}{m}{u}'
            '{o}{m}{u}' '{i}{kh}' '{y}{kh}' '{u}{iu}' '{iu}{iu}' '{a}{ia}'
            '{ia}{ia}'
                        // and -
            '{o}{iu}'   // - which is somewhat archaic
            '{e}{iu}'   // - soft form of {o}{iu}
                (delete)
        )
    )

    define adjectival as (
        adjective

        /* of the participle forms, em, vsh, ivsh, yvsh are readily removable.
           nn, {iu}shch, shch, u{iu}shch can be removed, with a small proportion of
           errors. Removing im, uem, enn creates too many errors.
        */

        try (
            [substring] among (
                '{e}{m}'                  // present passive participle
                '{n}{n}'                  // adjective from past passive participle
                '{v}{sh}'                 // past active participle
                '{iu}{shch}' '{shch}'     // present active participle
                    ('{a}' or '{ia}' delete)

     //but not  '{i}{m}' '{u}{e}{m}'      // present passive participle
     //or       '{e}{n}{n}'               // adjective from past passive participle

                '{i}{v}{sh}' '{y}{v}{sh}'// past active participle
                '{u}{iu}{shch}'          // present active participle
                    (delete)
            )
        )

    )

    define reflexive as (
        [substring] among (
            '{s}{ia}'
            '{s}{'}'
                (delete)
        )
    )

    define verb as (
        [substring] among (
            '{l}{a}' '{n}{a}' '{e}{t}{e}' '{i`}{t}{e}' '{l}{i}' '{i`}'
            '{l}' '{e}{m}' '{n}' '{l}{o}' '{n}{o}' '{e}{t}' '{iu}{t}'
            '{n}{y}' '{t}{'}' '{e}{sh}{'}'

            '{n}{n}{o}'
                ('{a}' or '{ia}' delete)

            '{i}{l}{a}' '{y}{l}{a}' '{e}{n}{a}' '{e}{i`}{t}{e}'
            '{u}{i`}{t}{e}' '{i}{t}{e}' '{i}{l}{i}' '{y}{l}{i}' '{e}{i`}'
            '{u}{i`}' '{i}{l}' '{y}{l}' '{i}{m}' '{y}{m}' '{e}{n}'
            '{i}{l}{o}' '{y}{l}{o}' '{e}{n}{o}' '{ia}{t}' '{u}{e}{t}'
            '{u}{iu}{t}' '{i}{t}' '{y}{t}' '{e}{n}{y}' '{i}{t}{'}'
            '{y}{t}{'}' '{i}{sh}{'}' '{u}{iu}' '{iu}'
                (delete)
            /* note the short passive participle tests:
               '{n}{a}' '{n}' '{n}{o}' '{n}{y}'
               '{e}{n}{a}' '{e}{n}' '{e}{n}{o}' '{e}{n}{y}'
            */
        )
    )

    define noun as (
        [substring] among (
            '{a}' '{e}{v}' '{o}{v}' '{i}{e}' '{'}{e}' '{e}'
            '{i}{ia}{m}{i}' '{ia}{m}{i}' '{a}{m}{i}' '{e}{i}' '{i}{i}'
            '{i}' '{i}{e}{i`}' '{e}{i`}' '{o}{i`}' '{i}{i`}' '{i`}'
            '{i}{ia}{m}' '{ia}{m}' '{i}{e}{m}' '{e}{m}' '{a}{m}' '{o}{m}'
            '{o}' '{u}' '{a}{kh}' '{i}{ia}{kh}' '{ia}{kh}' '{y}' '{'}'
            '{i}{iu}' '{'}{iu}' '{iu}' '{i}{ia}' '{'}{ia}' '{ia}'
                (delete)
            /* the small class of neuter forms '{e}{n}{i}' '{e}{n}{e}{m}'
               '{e}{n}{a}' '{e}{n}' '{e}{n}{a}{m}' '{e}{n}{a}{m}{i}' '{e}{n}{a}{x}'
               omitted - they only occur on 12 words.
            */
        )
    )

    define derivational as (
        [substring] R2 among (
            '{o}{s}{t}'
            '{o}{s}{t}{'}'
                (delete)
        )
    )

    define tidy_up as (
        [substring] among (

            '{e}{i`}{sh}'
            '{e}{i`}{sh}{e}'  // superlative forms
               (delete
                ['{n}'] '{n}' delete
               )
            '{n}'
               ('{n}' delete) // e.g. -nno endings
            '{'}'
               (delete)  // with some slight false conflations
        )
    )
)

define stem as (

    do mark_regions
    backwards setlimit tomark pV for (
        do (
             perfective_gerund or
             ( try reflexive
               adjectival or verb or noun
             )
        )
        try([ '{i}' ] delete)
        // because noun ending -i{iu} is being treated as verb ending -{iu}

        do derivational
        do tidy_up
    )
)
